Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2182
Referees; special allotments; when directed.

For good and sufficient reasons appearing to the court, the referee or referees may be directed to allot particular portions of the land to particular individuals. In other cases the shares must be made as nearly as possible of equal value.

R.S.1867, Code § 813, p. 539;

R.S.1913, § 8297;

C.S.1922, § 9250;

C.S.1929, § 20-2182;

R.S.1943, § 25-2182.

The trial court is given power to direct the referee to allot particular portions of land to particular individuals, and unless so allotted the shares may be drawn by lot. Trowbridge v. Donner, 152 Neb. 206, 40 N.W.2d 655 (1950).

Court may allot particular portions to particular individuals. McClave v. McClave, 60 Neb. 464, 83 N.W. 668 (1900).

Court may award compensation or charge land where incapable of fair division. Lynch v. Lynch, 18 Neb. 586, 26 N.W. 390 (1886).